Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 17.6. Motor Vehicle Manufacturers’ Warranty Adjustment Act.

§ 59.1-207.34.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Adjustment program” means any extended policy program under which a manufacturer undertakes to pay for all or any part of the cost of repairing, or to reimburse purchasers for all or any part of the cost of repairing, any condition that may substantially
affect vehicle durability, reliability or performance, other than service provided under a safety or emission-related recall program. This term shall not include ad hoc adjustments made by a manufacturer on a case-by-case basis.

“Consumer” means the purchaser, other than for purposes of resale, or the lessee of a motor vehicle and shall also include any person to whom such motor vehicle is transferred and any other person entitled by the terms of adjustment program to enforce
its obligations.

“Dealer” means any motor vehicle dealer as defined in §

46.2-1500

.

“Division” means the Division of Consumer Counsel in the Department of Law.

“Manufacturer” means any person, whether resident or nonresident, who manufactures, assembles, or imports motor vehicles for sale or distribution in this Commonwealth.

“Motor vehicle” means any motor vehicle as defined in §

46.2-100

, but shall not include any motorcycle or motor home.

History.
1991, c. 300; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 16 provides: “That the Governor may transfer an appropriation or any portion thereof within a state agency established, abolished, or otherwise affected by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, or from one such
agency to another, to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, provided that any such transfer shall be limited to salary and fringe benefits
for any personnel transferred and reasonable administrative overhead and costs.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 13, are identical, and deleted the definition of “Board,” which read: “‘Board’ means the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services.”; and added the paragraph defining “Division.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 13.

§ 59.1-207.35.
Requirements of manufacturers.

Every manufacturer shall:

Inform a consumer of any adjustment program applicable to his motor vehicle and, upon request, furnish the consumer with any document issued by a manufacturer pertaining to any adjustment program or to any condition that may substantially affect vehicle
durability, reliability or performance;

Notify, by first-class mail, all owners of motor vehicles eligible under any adjustment program of the condition giving rise to and the principal terms and conditions of such program within ninety days of the adoption of the program; and

Notify its dealers, in writing, of all the terms and conditions of any adjustment program within thirty days of its adoption.

History.
1991, c. 300.

§ 59.1-207.36.
Required disclosures.

Every manufacturer or distributor, either directly or through its authorized agent, shall cause a notice to be given to the consumer which outlines the provisions of this chapter and the rights and remedies thereunder. The written notice shall state at
minimum: “Sometimes (insert manufacturer’s name) offers a special adjustment program to pay all or part of the cost of certain repairs beyond the terms of the warranty. Check with your dealer to determine whether any adjustment
program is applicable to your motor vehicle.”

Every dealer shall disclose to a consumer seeking repairs for a particular condition, the principal terms and conditions of any manufacturer’s adjustment program covering such condition provided the dealer has been notified of the adjustment program pursuant
to § 59.1-207.35.

History.
1991, c. 300.

§ 59.1-207.37.
Adjustment program reimbursement.

Every manufacturer who establishes any adjustment program shall implement and follow procedures to ensure reimbursement for each consumer eligible under any such program who incurred expenses for repair of the condition subject to the program prior to
acquiring knowledge thereof. Such reimbursement shall be consistent with the terms and conditions of the adjustment program.

Any claim for reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be made in writing to the manufacturer within two years of the date of the consumer’s payment of repairs for the condition. The manufacturer shall notify the consumer in writing within twenty-one
business days of receiving a claim for reimbursement whether the claim will be allowed or denied. If the claim is denied, the specific reasons for such denial shall be stated in writing.

History.
1991, c. 300.

§ 59.1-207.38.
Enforcement; penalties.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice pursuant to the provisions of § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to any and all of the enforcement provisions of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (§ 59.1-196 et seq.)
of this title. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, it shall not be a violation of this chapter if the manufacturer within thirty days after the conclusion of the notice period required by subdivision 2 of § 59.1-207.35,
upon notice from a consumer of the consumer’s eligibility under an adjustment program, repairs or causes to be repaired the consumer’s motor vehicle in accordance with the terms and conditions of the adjustment program.

History.
1991, c. 300; 1996, c. 63.

§ 59.1-207.39.
Regulations.

The Division is authorized to promulgate reasonable regulations in order to implement the provisions of this chapter. These regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.
1991, c. 300; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 16 provides: “That the Governor may transfer an appropriation or any portion thereof within a state agency established, abolished, or otherwise affected by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, or from one such
agency to another, to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, provided that any such transfer shall be limited to salary and fringe benefits
for any personnel transferred and reasonable administrative overhead and costs.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 13, are identical, and substituted “Division” for “Board” near the beginning of the first sentence.